District of Columbia statutes.
42-1211

Surcharges.

(a)

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a surcharge of $5 per document shall be paid before any document is accepted for recordation at the Recorder of Deeds.

(b)

In addition to the funds collected pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, the Recorder of Deeds may accept monetary and non-monetary donations.

(c)

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1276, ch. 854, § 552a
as added Apr. 12, 1997, D.C. Law 11-257, § 2, 44 DCR 1247
Oct. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 14-28, § 2402, 48 DCR 6981
Aug. 16, 2008, D.C. Law 17-219, § 2017, 55 DCR 7598
This section is referenced in § 42-1214.
1981 Ed., § 45-909.1.
D.C. Law 14-28 rewrote subsec. (c) which had read as follows: “(c) The $5 surcharge established pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall remain in effect for a 5-year period beginning from April 12, 1997.”
D.C. Law 17-219 repealed subsec. (c), which had read as follows: “(c) The $5 surcharge established under subsection (a) of this section shall remain in effect for a 10-year period beginning from April 12, 1997.”
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2202 of Fiscal Year 2002 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-124, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7861).
Short title: Section 2016 of D.C. Law 17-219 provided that subtitle G of title II of the act may be cited as the “Recorder of Deeds Recordation Surcharge Amendment Act of 2008”.
Section 2018 of D.C. Law 17-219 provided that this subtitle shall apply as of April 11, 2007.